District of Columbia statutes.
34-2410.04

Inspection of private fire hydrants.

(a)

The Mayor and the District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority shall have a right of access for the inspection of any private fire hydrant in the District of Columbia to determine operational ability and compliance with applicable standards. The Mayor and the District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority shall designate, through a memorandum of understanding, the agency or authority responsible for the inspection of private fire hydrants (“Inspection Agency”). If such a memorandum of understanding is not executed and in effect, then the Mayor shall be the Inspection Agency for purposes of this subchapter.

(b)

The Inspection Agency shall regularly inspect all private fire hydrants in the District of Columbia to determine operational ability and compliance with applicable standards.

(c)

Upon determination by the Inspection Agency that a private fire hydrant is in need of maintenance, repair, or replacement, and if ownership has been determined pursuant to § 34-2410.05, the Inspection Agency shall notify:

(1)

The Mayor and the District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority of the status of the private fire hydrant; and

(2)

The owner of the private fire hydrant, in writing, of:

(A)

The location of the private fire hydrant in need of maintenance, repair, or replacement;

(B)

The owner’s responsibility with regard to the maintenance, repair and replacement of the private fire hydrant;

(C)

The maintenance, repair, and replacement identified as necessary for the private fire hydrant;

(D)

The owner’s responsibility to effect the maintenance, repair, and replacement identified in the notice within a specified period of time, which shall be not less than 60 days of the date on which notice is provided under this section; and

(E)

The right of the District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority to effect the maintenance, repair and replacement of the private fire hydrant and bill the owner as described in § 34-2410.03.

(d)

The Inspection Agency shall keep and maintain records of all inspections made of a private fire hydrant and shall make the records available to the owner of the private fire hydrant upon request. The records shall be kept and maintained for not less than 10 years.

Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-337, § 5, 58 DCR 609
This section is referenced in § 34-2410.03.